North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 4. Timeshares.
§ 93A-52.
Application for registration of timeshare program; denial of registration; renewal; reinstatement; and termination of developer’s interest.

Prior to the offering in this State of any timeshare located in this State, the developer of the timeshare program shall make written application to the Commission for the registration of the program.

(a1)

The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount fixed by the Commission but not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), and shall include (i) a description of the program, (ii) copies of proposed timeshare declaration, timeshare program governing documents, public offering statement, form timeshare instrument, form contract for sale, if different than the timeshare instrument, and other documents referred to in the public offering statement, (iii) information pertaining to any marketing or managing entity to be employed by the developer for the sale of timeshares in a timeshare program, (iv) information regarding any exchange program available to the owner, (v) an irrevocable appointment of the Commission to receive service of any lawful process in any proceeding against the developer or the developer’s timeshare salespersons arising under this Article, and (vi) such other information as the Commission may by rule require.

(a2)

Upon receipt of a properly completed application and fee and upon a determination by the Commission that the sale of the timeshares in the timeshare program will be directed and conducted by persons of good moral character, the Commission shall issue to the developer a certificate of registration authorizing the developer to offer timeshares in the program for sale. The Commission shall, within 30 days after receipt of an incomplete application, notify the developer by mail that the Commission has found specified deficiencies, and shall, within 60 days after the receipt of a properly completed application, either issue the certificate of registration or notify the developer by mail or by electronic means of any specific objections to the registration of the program. Once issued, the certificate shall be available for inspection upon request of the Commission, and a copy of the certificate shall be available for inspection by written request from any purchaser or owner.

(a3)

The developer shall promptly report to the Commission any and all material changes in the information required to be submitted for the purpose of the registration. The developer shall also immediately furnish the Commission complete information regarding any change in its interest in a registered timeshare program, other than the transfer of timeshares to purchasers in the ordinary course of its business. If a developer disposes of, or otherwise terminates its interest in a timeshare program, the developer shall cease all marketing and sales of timeshares, certify to the Commission in writing that its interest in the timeshare program is terminated, and shall return to the Commission for cancellation the certificate of registration.

If the Commission finds that there is substantial reason to deny the application for registration as a timeshare program, the Commission shall notify the developer that such application has been denied and shall afford the developer an opportunity for a hearing before the Commission to show cause why the application should not be denied. In all proceedings to deny a certificate of registration, the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes shall be applicable.

The acceptance by the Commission of an application for registration shall not constitute the approval of its contents or waive the authority of the Commission to take disciplinary action as provided by this Article.

All certificates of registration granted and issued by the Commission under the provisions of this Article shall expire on the 30th day of June following issuance thereof, and shall become invalid after that date unless reinstated. A certificate may be renewed 45 days prior to the expiration date by filing an application with and paying to the Commission the timeshare registration renewal fee fixed by the Commission but not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for each timeshare program. Each certificate reinstated after the expiration date thereof shall be subject to a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) in addition to the required renewal fee. If a developer fails to reinstate the registration within 12 months after the expiration date thereof, the Commission may, in its discretion, consider the timeshare program as not having been previously registered, and thereby subject to the provisions of this Article relating to the issuance of an original certificate. Duplicate certificates may be issued by the Commission upon payment of a fee of one dollar ($1.00) by the registrant developer. Except as prescribed by Commission rules, all fees paid pursuant to this Article shall be nonrefundable.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, s. 5; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1999-229, s. 15; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2005-395, s. 22; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 22, effective April 1, 2006, in subsection (a), substituted “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500)” for “fifteen hundred dollars ($1500)” in the second sentence and inserted “time share” preceding “salespersons” in the last sentence; and deleted “late filing” preceding “fee of fifty” in the fourth sentence of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “timeshare program” for “time share project” in the section heading and throughout the section; substituted “timeshare” and “timeshares” for “time share” and “time shares” throughout the section; rewrote subsections (a1) through (a3); in subsection (b), substituted “If” for “In the event” in the beginning and “developer” for “applicant” twice; and rewrote subsection (d). For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-53.
Register of applicants; roster of registrants; financial report to Secretary of State.

The Executive Director of the Commission shall keep a register of all applicants for certificates of registration, showing for each the date of application, name, business address, and whether the certificate was granted or refused.

The Executive Director of the Commission shall also keep a current roster showing the name and address of all timeshare programs registered with the Commission. The roster shall be kept on file in the office of the Commission and be open to public inspection.

The Commission shall include a copy of the roster of timeshare programs current on the preceding June 30 and a statement of the income received by the Commission in connection with the registration of timeshare programs during the fiscal year ending on June 30 with the report required by

G.S. 93B-2

.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2011-217, s. 21; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 21, effective January 1, 2012, rewrote subsection (c), which pertained to the Commission’s duty to file a copy of the roster of time share projects on or before the first day of September of each year.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, deleted “registered projects” following “registrants” in the section heading; and substituted “timeshare programs” for “time share projects” in subsection (b) and twice in subsection (c). For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 93A-54.
Disciplinary action by Commission.

The Commission has power to take disciplinary action for violation of the provisions of this Article in the offering or sale of a timeshare program to a purchaser. Upon its own motion, or on the complaint of any person, the Commission may investigate the actions of any regulated party or any other person or entity who shall assume to act in such capacity of a regulated party. If the Commission finds probable cause that a timeshare regulated party has violated any of the provisions of this Article, the Commission may hold a hearing on the allegations of misconduct.

(a1)

The Commission has the power to suspend or revoke at any time a real estate license issued to a timeshare salesperson or program broker, or a certificate of registration of a timeshare program issued to a developer; or to reprimand or censure a regulated party; or to fine a regulated party in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each violation of this Article; or to impose any other specified penalty permitted under this Article; if, after a hearing, the Commission adjudges the regulated party to be guilty of any of the following:

Making any willful or negligent misrepresentation or any willful or negligent omission of material fact about any timeshare or timeshare program.

Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce.

Pursuing a course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through agents, salespersons, advertising or otherwise.

Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for all money received from others in a timeshare transaction, and failing to remit such monies as may be required in

G.S. 93A-45

of this Article.

Acting in a manner as to endanger the interest of the public.

Paying a commission, salary, or other valuable consideration to any person for acts or services performed in violation of this Article.

Any other conduct which constitutes improper, fraudulent, or dishonest dealing.

Performing or undertaking to perform any legal service as set forth in

G.S. 84-2.1

, or any other acts not specifically set forth in that section.

Failing to deposit and maintain in an escrow account all money received from others in a timeshare transaction as may be required in

G.S. 93A-42

or

G.S. 93A-45

.

Failing to deliver to a purchaser a public offering statement containing the information required by

G.S. 93A-44

and any other disclosures that the Commission may by regulation require.

Failing to comply with the provisions of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes in the advertising or promotion of timeshares for sale, or failing to assure such compliance by persons engaged on behalf of a developer.

Failing to comply with the provisions of

G.S. 93A-48

in furnishing complete and accurate information to purchasers concerning any exchange program which may be offered to such purchaser or owner.

Making any false or fraudulent representation on an application for registration.

Violating any rule or regulation promulgated by the Commission.

Failing to record or cause to be recorded a timeshare instrument as required by

G.S. 93A-42

(c1) [G.S. 93A-42(c)] or failing to provide an owner the protection against liens required by G.S. 93A-57(a).

Failing as a timeshare program broker to exercise reasonable and adequate supervision of the conduct of sales at a project or location by the brokers and salespersons under the timeshare program broker’s control.

(a2)

The clear proceeds of fines collected pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Following a hearing, the Commission shall also have power to suspend or revoke any certificate of registration issued under the provisions of this Article or to reprimand or censure any regulated party when the regulated party has been convicted or has entered a plea of guilty or no contest upon which final judgment is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State, or any other state, of the criminal offenses of embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretense, fraud, forgery, conspiracy to defraud, or any other offense involving moral turpitude which would reasonably affect the regulated party’s performance in the timeshare business.

The Commission may appear in its own name in superior court in actions for injunctive relief to prevent any person or entity from violating the provisions of this Article or rules promulgated by the Commission. The superior court shall have the power to grant these injunctions even if criminal prosecution has been or may be instituted as a result of the violations, or regardless of whether the regulated party or person has been registered by the Commission.

Each developer shall maintain or cause to be maintained complete records of every timeshare transaction and each independent escrow agent shall maintain or cause to be maintained complete records pertaining to the deposit, maintenance, and withdrawal of money required to be held in an escrow account, or as otherwise required by the Commission, under

G.S. 93A-45

of this Article. The Commission may inspect these records periodically without prior notice and may also inspect these records whenever the Commission determines that they are pertinent to an investigation of any specific complaint against a developer or independent escrow agent.

When a licensee is accused of any act, omission, or misconduct under this Article which would subject the licensee to disciplinary action, the licensee may, with the consent and approval of the Commission, surrender the licensee’s license and all the rights and privileges pertaining to it for a period of time to be established by the Commission. A licensee who surrenders a license shall not be eligible for, or submit any application for, licensure as a real estate broker or registration of a timeshare program during the period of license surrender. For the purposes of this section, the term licensee shall include a developer.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, ss. 6-10; 1987, c. 516, ss. 17, 18; 1998-215, s. 138; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2001-487, s. 23(l); 2005-395, s. 23; 2011-217, s. 22; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Pursuant to the direction of the Reviser of Statutes, redesignation changes were made and the bracketed reference was inserted in subdivision (a1)(15).

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 23, effective April 1, 2006, substituted “salespersons” for “salesperson” preceding “advertising” in subdivision (a)(3); and deleted “or salesperson” preceding “or registration” in subsection (e).

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 22, effective January 1, 2012, substituted “maintain in a broker’s trust or escrow account as defined by

G.S. 93A-6(g)

” for “maintain in a trust or escrow account in an insured bank or savings and loan association in North Carolina” in subdivision (a)(9).

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-55.
Private enforcement.

The provisions of the Article shall not be construed to limit in any manner the right of a purchaser, owner, or other person injured by a violation of this Article to bring a private action.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, inserted “, owner” in the middle of the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 93A-56.
Penalty for violation of Article.

Except as specifically provided elsewhere in this Article, any person violating the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, s. 11; 1987, c. 516, s. 19; 1993, c. 539, s. 658; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “specifically provided elsewhere in this Article” for “provided in G.S. 93A 40(b) and G.S. 93A 58.” For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-57.
Release of liens or subordination and notice to creditors instrument.

Prior to any closing, the developer shall record a release of all liens or encumbrances affecting the timeshare being acquired by the purchaser or the timeshare property or comply with one of the following:

If there are any interest holders in the timeshare or timeshare property, the developer and any interest holders must execute and record a subordination and notice to creditors instrument in the jurisdiction in which the timeshare or timeshare program is situated. The subordination and notice to creditors instrument shall contain the following:

Language sufficient to provide subsequent creditors of the developer and interest holder with notice of the existence of the timeshare program and of the rights of owners in order to protect the interests of the owners from any claims of subsequent creditors.

A statement that the instrument shall be effective as between the owner and the developer and interest holder despite any bankruptcy proceedings involving the developer.

A statement that so long as an owner remains in good standing with respect to the owner’s obligations under the timeshare declaration, then the interest holder will honor all rights of the owner as reflected in the timeshare declaration.

If there are any interest holders in the timeshare or the timeshare property, the developer must make alternative arrangements that are adequate to protect the rights of the owners of the timeshares and timeshare property, provided that any alternative arrangement is approved by the Commission.

Unless a timeshare owner or a timeshare owner who [is] the owner’s predecessor in title agree[s] otherwise with the lienor, if a lien other than a mortgage or deed of trust becomes effective against more than one timeshare in a timeshare program, any timeshare owner is entitled to a release of the owner’s timeshare from a lien upon payment of the amount of the lien attributable to the owner’s timeshare. The amount of the payment must be proportionate to the ratio that the owner’s liability bears to the liabilities of all owners whose interests are subject to the lien. Upon receipt of payment, the lien holder shall promptly deliver to the owner a release of the lien covering that timeshare. After payment, the managing entity may not assess or have a lien against that timeshare for any portion of the expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, s. 12; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

The bracketed corrections in the first sentence of subsection (b) were made at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-58.
Registrar required; criminal penalties; program broker.

Every developer shall, by affidavit filed with the Commission, designate a natural person to serve as timeshare registrar for its registered timeshare program. The timeshare registrar shall be responsible for the recordation of timeshare instruments and the release of liens required by

G.S. 93A-42(c)

and G.S. 93A-57(a). A developer may, from time to time, change the designated timeshare registrar by proper filing with the Commission and by otherwise complying with this subsection. No sales or offers to sell shall be made until the registrar is designated for a timeshare program.

(a1)

The timeshare registrar has the duty to ensure that the provisions of this Article are complied with in a timeshare program for which the person is the timeshare registrar. No timeshare registrar shall record a timeshare instrument except as provided by this Article.

A timeshare registrar is guilty of a Class I felony if the timeshare registrar knowingly or recklessly fails to record or cause to be recorded a timeshare instrument as required by this Article. A person responsible as general partner, corporate officer, joint venturer, or sole proprietor of the developer of a timeshare project is guilty of a Class I felony if the person intentionally allows the offering for sale or the sale of a timeshare to purchasers without first designating a timeshare registrar.

The developer shall designate for each timeshare program and other locations where timeshares are sold or offered for sale a program broker. The program broker shall act as supervising broker for all timeshare salespersons at the timeshare program or other location and shall directly, personally, and actively supervise all such persons at the timeshare program or other locations in a manner to reasonably ensure that the sale of timeshares will be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1985, c. 578, s. 13; 1987, c. 516, s. 20; 1993, c. 539, s. 1289; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2001-487, s. 23(m); 2005-395, s. 24; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

The subsection designated as (b) by Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), was redesignated as subsection (a1) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 24, effective April 1, 2006, in subsection (c), substituted “time share” for “persons licensed as” and “such persons at the” for “persons licensed as brokers or salespersons at the.”

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 93A-59.
Preservation of an owner’s claims and defenses.

For one year following the execution of an instrument of indebtedness for the purchase of a timeshare use, the owner may assert against the developer, assignee of the developer, or other holder of the instrument of indebtedness, any claims or defenses available against the developer, and the owner may not waive the right to assert these claims or defenses in connection with a timeshare purchase. Any recovery by the owner on a claim asserted against an assignee of the developer or other holder of the instrument of indebtedness shall not exceed the amount paid by the developer under the instrument. A holder shall be the person or entity with the rights of a holder as set forth in

G.S. 25-3-301

.

Every instrument of indebtedness for the purchase of a timeshare shall set forth in conspicuous type the following provision in substantially the following form:

“NOTICE

FOR A PERIOD OF ONE YEAR FOLLOWING THE EXECUTION OF THIS INSTRUMENT OF INDEBTEDNESS, ANY HOLDER OF THIS INSTRUMENT OF INDEBTEDNESS IS SUBJECT TO ALL CLAIMS AND DEFENSES WHICH THE OWNER COULD ASSERT AGAINST THE DEVELOPER OF THE TIMESHARE. RECOVERY BY THE OWNER SHALL NOT EXCEED AMOUNTS PAID BY THE OWNER UNDER THIS INSTRUMENT.”

History.

1985, c. 578, s. 13; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

§ 93A-60.
Substantial compliance.

If a developer or managing entity has otherwise substantially complied with this Article, any nonmaterial errors or omissions shall not be the basis for any claims or defenses asserted by the purchaser; provided, however, that for purposes of this section, the developer or managing entity shall have the burden of proof.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Notes

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

§ 93A-61.
Management.

For each timeshare program, the developer shall provide for a managing entity, which shall be either the developer, a third-party management firm, or timeshare owners’ association.

The managing entity may not furnish the name, address, electronic mail address, or contact information of any owner to any person, including any other owner or authorized agent of an owner, unless the owner whose name, address, electronic mail address, or contact information is requested first approves the disclosure in writing. The managing entity shall maintain among its records and provide to the Commission upon request a complete list of the names and addresses of all owners in the timeshare program. The managing entity shall update this list at least quarterly. The managing entity may not publish this owners’ list or provide a copy of it to any owner or to any third party other than the Commission. However, the managing entity shall mail to those owners listed on the owners’ list materials provided by any owner, upon the written request of that owner, if the purpose of the mailing is to advance legitimate business of the timeshare program, including, but not limited to, a proxy solicitation for any purpose, including the recall of one or more directors elected by the owners or the discharge of the management firm. The managing entity shall be responsible for determining the appropriateness of any requested mailing. The owner who requests the mailing must reimburse the managing entity in advance for the actual, reasonable costs in performing the mailing. A mailing requested for the purpose of advancing legitimate business of the timeshare program shall occur within 30 days after receipt of a request from an owner.

The predecessor in interest, or a transfer service provider for the predecessor in interest, shall deliver to the managing entity a copy of the timeshare instrument, which shall be a copy of the recorded timeshare instrument if the timeshare is a timeshare estate, together with the name and mailing address of the successor in interest within 15 days after the date of transfer, and after such delivery, the successor in interest shall be listed by the managing entity as the owner of the timeshare on the books and records. The managing entity shall not be liable to any person for any inaccuracy in the books and records arising from the failure of the predecessor in interest to timely and correctly notify the managing entity of the name and mailing address of the successor in interest.

The managing entity shall make the books and records reasonably available for inspection by any owner or the authorized agent of an owner. The managing entity may charge the owner a reasonable fee for copying or providing the requested information; however, any owner or agent of an owner shall be permitted to personally inspect and examine the books and records wherever located at any reasonable time, under reasonable conditions, and under the supervision of the custodian of those records. All books and financial records of the timeshare program must be maintained in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices. The managing entity may require any owner or authorized agent of an owner to execute and provide a reasonable confidentiality or nondisclosure agreement prohibiting the disclosure of books and records to nonowners.

All notices or other information sent by a managing entity may be delivered to an owner by electronic mail, provided that the owner first consents electronically to the use of electronic mail for notice purposes. The consent to receive notice by electronic mail is effective until revoked by the owner.

An officer, director, or agent of a timeshare owners’ association shall discharge their duties in good faith, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and in a manner they reasonably believe to be in the interests of the timeshare owners’ association. An officer, director, or agent of a timeshare owners’ association shall be exempt from liability for monetary damages unless the officer, director, or agent breached or failed to perform their duties and the breach of, or failure to perform, those duties constitutes a violation of criminal law, constitutes a transaction from which the officer, director, or agent derived an improper personal benefit, either directly or indirectly, or constitutes recklessness or an act or omission that was in bad faith, with malicious purpose, or in a manner exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human rights, safety, or property.

If a state of emergency is declared pursuant to the North Carolina Emergency Management Act or by any governmental agency with authority in the locale in which timeshare property is located, then the following apply:

The managing entity may, but is not required to, exercise the following powers:

Conduct board meetings and owner meetings with notice given in any practicable manner, including publication, radio, conspicuous posting on the timeshare property, electronic means, or any other means the board deems reasonable under the circumstances. Notice of board decisions may be communicated in the same manner as notice of the meetings is given.

Cancel and reschedule any timeshare owners’ association meeting.

Name as assistant officers persons who are not directors of the board. Named assistant officers shall have the same authority as the executive officers to whom they are assistants during the state of emergency to accommodate the incapacity or unavailability of any officer of the timeshare owners’ association.

Relocate the managing entity’s principal office or designate alternative principal offices or conduct business remotely.

Enter into agreements with government agencies to assist in responding to the emergency.

Implement an emergency plan for which a state of emergency is declared. The emergency plan may include, but is not limited to, shutting down all or any portion of timeshare units, amenities, or timeshare projects, including shutting off systems or utilities.

Determine that all or any portion of the timeshare property is unavailable for entry or occupancy by owners or any other person to protect the health, safety, or welfare of owners or persons or to properly respond to the emergency. Should any person enter or occupy the timeshare property when the board has declared the timeshare property is unavailable for entry or occupancy for those persons, and without board approval, the board and the association shall be immune from liability or injury to persons or property arising from that failure or refusal.

Require occupancy of timeshare units to be aggregated in certain parts of the timeshare property even if other parts of the timeshare property are habitable.

Require the evacuation of all or any portion of the timeshare property in the event of a mandatory evacuation order or in order to respond to the emergency. Should any person fail or refuse to evacuate the timeshare property where the board has required evacuation, the board and the association shall be immune from liability or injury to persons or property arising from that failure or refusal.

Make a determination whether all or any portion of the timeshare property can be safely inhabited or occupied; provided, however, any determination is not conclusive as to any determination of habitability pursuant to applicable law or the timeshare declaration.

Temporarily suspend or modify rules and regulations concerning the physical use of all or any portion of the timeshare property.

Mitigate further damage, including taking action to contract for the removal of debris and to prevent or mitigate the spread of fungus or disease notwithstanding timeshare declaration provisions regarding owner approval of changes to the timeshare units or amenities.

Regardless of any provision to the contrary and even if such authority does not specifically appear in the timeshare declaration, levy special assessments without a vote of the owners.

Without owners’ approval, borrow money and pledge association assets as collateral to fund emergency repairs, to respond to the emergency, or to carry out the duties of the association when operating funds are insufficient.

Temporarily suspend or modify timeshare program reservation system rules and regulations to manage owner reservations and use rights in the best interests of the owners as a whole, including cancelling existing reservations, extending expiring use rights, or suspending or modifying priority periods and priority reservation rights. A temporary suspension or modification shall be permitted even if owners must compete for reservation and use of timeshare periods and timeshare units on a more than one-to-one use night to use right ratio.

Toll the expiration of any claim of lien arising under G.S. 93A-62(d)(4) for the duration of the state of emergency, provided that the beginning and ending dates for each period of tolling are recorded in the public records and the owner is notified of the end of the tolling period.

Modify or suspend assessment and collection requirements and activity, including deferring due dates or waiving late charges and interest, provided that all owners are treated equally as of the date of modification and suspension, and owners who have previously made timely payments have their future assessments adjusted in a manner that fairly compensates them for making timely payments in advance of the modification or suspension.

The emergency powers authorized and exercised shall be limited to that time reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the managing entity and the owners and reasonably necessary to mitigate further damage and make emergency repairs, notwithstanding the termination of the state of emergency. Further, the managing entity may take any actions that are necessary to implement the exercised powers even if the implementation takes place after the termination of the state of emergency, provided that the implementation is necessary and does not go beyond the scope of the exercised power.

In the exercise of emergency powers, the managing entity may take into account the economic consequences of the emergency to the owners; however, the managing entity shall give greater weight to the health, safety, and welfare of the managing entity and the owners and mitigation of further damage and adhere to the business judgment rule in balancing economic considerations with owner opportunity to enjoy the use of the timeshare property.

In the exercise of the emergency powers, the managing entity will be deemed to have met any duty of care if the managing entity has relied upon advice of emergency management officials or upon the advice of licensed professionals with applicable expertise.

History.

2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Pursuant to the direction of the Revisor of Statutes,
a semicolon was substituted for a comma preceding “however” in subsection (d).

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), made this section effective October 6, 2021, and further provided: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”